Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201850-503
University of Nebraska; university's
health care insurance programs and health care trust fund; plan presented
to Appropriations Committee.

The University of Nebraska shall, on or before December
1 of each year, present its plan regarding the management of the university's
health care insurance programs and its health care trust fund to the Appropriations
Committee of the Legislature. This presentation shall include, but is not
limited to, the amount of reserves in the trust fund.

Laws 2013, LB620, § 2.